Nevada, session 83, AB311.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 690B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer shall not, for any accident or motor vehicle
crash that occurs during the personal use of a motor vehicle,
refuse to provide coverage under or refuse to fulfill the obligations
of a policy of motor vehicle insurance that is held by an insured,
claimant or group of insured or claimants because the insured,
claimant or group of insured or claimants is a driver for a
transportation network company.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Driver” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706A.040.
(b) “Personal use of a motor vehicle” means any use of a
motor vehicle which is insured by the driver that occurs while the
driver is not:
(1) Providing transportation services; or
(2) Logged into the digital network or software application
service of the transportation network company and available to
receive requests for transportation services but is not otherwise
providing transportation services.
(c) “Transportation network company” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 706A.050.
(d) “Transportation services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706A.060.
Sec. 2. NRS 690B.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
690B.470 1. Every transportation network company or driver
shall continuously provide, during any period in which the driver is
providing transportation services, transportation network company
insurance provided by an insurance company licensed by the
Division of Insurance of the Department of Business and Industry
and approved to do business in this State or a broker licensed
pursuant to chapter 685A of NRS or procured directly from a
nonadmitted insurer, as defined in NRS 685A.0375:
(a) For the payment of tort liabilities arising from the
maintenance or use of the motor vehicle:
(1) In an amount of not less than $1,500,000 for bodily injury
to or death of one or more persons and injury to or destruction of
property of others in any one accident or motor vehicle crash that
occurs while the driver is providing transportation services;
[(b)] (2) In an amount of not less than $50,000 for bodily injury
to or death of one person in any one accident or motor vehicle crash
that occurs while the driver is logged into the digital network or
software application service of the transportation network company
-
*AB311*

– 3 –
and available to receive requests for transportation services but is
not otherwise providing transportation services;
[(c)] (3) Subject to the minimum amount for one person required
by [paragraph (b),] subparagraph (2), in an amount of not less than
$100,000 for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any
one accident or motor vehicle crash that occurs while the driver is
logged into the digital network or software application service of the
transportation network company and available to receive requests
for transportation services but is not otherwise providing
transportation services; and
[(d)] (4) In an amount of not less than $25,000 for injury to or
destruction of property of others in any one accident or motor
vehicle crash that occurs while the driver is logged into the digital
network or software application service of the transportation
network company and available to receive requests for
transportation services but is not otherwise providing transportation
services [,
 for the payment of tort liabilities arising from the maintenance or
use of the motor vehicle.] ;
(b) In an amount of not less than $10,000 for the medical
payments coverage of any occupant of the motor vehicle in any
one accident or motor vehicle crash that occurs while the driver is:
(1) Providing transportation services; or
(2) Logged into the digital network or software application
service of the transportation network company and available to
receive requests for transportation services but is not otherwise
providing transportation services; and
(c) In an amount of not less than $1,000,000 for uninsured
and underinsured motorist coverage for any occupant of the motor
vehicle in any one accident or motor vehicle crash that occurs
while the driver is:
(1) Providing transportation services; or
(2) Logged into the digital network or software application
service of the transportation network company and available to
receive requests for transportation services but is not otherwise
providing transportation services.
2. Every monitored autonomous vehicle provider shall
continuously provide, during any period in which a monitored
autonomous vehicle provider is operating a monitored autonomous
vehicle, transportation network company insurance provided by an
insurance company licensed by the Division of Insurance of the
Department of Business and Industry and approved to do business in
this State or a broker licensed pursuant to chapter 685A of NRS or
procured directly from a nonadmitted insurer, as defined in NRS
685A.0375, in an amount of not less than $1,500,000 for bodily
-
*AB311*

– 4 –
injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident or
motor vehicle crash that occurs while the monitored autonomous
vehicle provider is operating a monitored autonomous vehicle for
the payment of tort liabilities arising from the maintenance or use of
the monitored autonomous vehicle.
3. The transportation network company insurance required by
subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, may be provided through one or a
combination of insurance policies provided by the transportation
network company, the driver, the monitored autonomous vehicle
provider, both the transportation network company and the driver or
both the transportation network company and the monitored
autonomous vehicle provider.
4. Every transportation network company shall continuously
provide, during any period in which the driver or monitored
autonomous vehicle provider is providing transportation services,
transportation network company insurance provided by an insurance
company licensed by the Division of Insurance of the Department of
Business and Industry and approved to do business in this State or a
broker licensed pursuant to chapter 685A of NRS or procured
directly from a nonadmitted insurer, as defined in NRS 685A.0375,
which meets the requirements of subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, as
primary insurance if the insurance provided by the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider:
(a) Lapses; or
(b) Fails to meet the requirements of subsection 1 or 2, as
applicable.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 485.185 and
485.186 which require the owner or operator of a motor vehicle to
provide insurance, transportation network company insurance shall
be deemed to satisfy the requirements of NRS 485.185 or 485.186,
as appropriate, regardless of whether the insurance is provided by
the transportation network company, the driver, the monitored
autonomous vehicle provider, both the transportation network
company and the driver or both the transportation network company
and the monitored autonomous vehicle provider, if the
transportation network company insurance otherwise satisfies the
requirements of NRS 485.185 or 485.186, as appropriate.
6. In addition to the coverage required pursuant to
[subsection] :
(a) Subsection 1 , [or 2, as applicable,] a policy of transportation
network company insurance may include additional coverage,
including, without limitation, [coverage for medical payments,
coverage for uninsured or underinsured motorists,] comprehensive
coverage and collision coverage.
-
*AB311*

– 5 –
(b) Subsection 2, a policy of transportation network company
insurance may include additional coverage, including, without
limitation, coverage for medical payments, coverage for uninsured
or underinsured motorists, comprehensive coverage and collision
coverage.
7. An insurer who provides transportation network company
insurance shall not require a policy of insurance for the operation of
a motor vehicle required pursuant to NRS 485.185 or 485.186, as
appropriate, to deny a claim before the transportation network
company insurance provides coverage for a claim.
8. An insurer who provides transportation network company
insurance has a duty to defend and indemnify the driver or
monitored autonomous vehicle provider and the transportation
network company.
9. An insurer who provides transportation network company
insurance which includes comprehensive coverage or collision
coverage for the operation of a motor vehicle against which a
lienholder holds a lien shall issue any payment for a claim under
such coverage:
(a) Directly to the person who performs repairs upon the
vehicle; or
(b) Jointly to the owner of the vehicle and the lienholder.
10. A transportation network company that provides
transportation network company insurance for a motor vehicle is not
deemed to be the owner of the motor vehicle.
11. As used in this section [, “monitored] :
(a) “Medical payments coverage” means coverage for the
payment of reasonable and necessary hospital and medical
expenses resulting from an accident or motor vehicle crash.
(b) “Monitored autonomous vehicle” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 706A.045.
(c) “Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage” means
the coverage described in subsection 2 of NRS 687B.145.
H
-
*AB311*